test/src/morphology/N-jwugw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - jõugõ: # Noun 116 'eng /est liiv/fin' - full paradigm
     jõugõ+N+Sg+Nom: jõugõ
     jõugõ+N+Sg+Gen: jõugõ
     jõugõ+N+Sg+Par: jȭgţa
     jõugõ+N+Sg+Dat: jõugõn
     jõugõ+N+Sg+Ins: jõugõks
     jõugõ+N+Sg+Ill: [jõugõz, jõugõ]
     jõugõ+N+Sg+Ela: jõugõst
     jõugõ+N+Pl+Nom: jõugõd
     jõugõ+N+Pl+Gen: jõugõd
     jõugõ+N+Pl+Par: jõugidi
     jõugõ+N+Pl+Dat: jõugõdõn
     jõugõ+N+Pl+Ins: jõugõdõks
     jõugõ+N+Pl+Ill: jõugiž
     jõugõ+N+Pl+Ela: jõugist
